Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2092
Receivership; termination; procedure; failure to terminate; effect.

(1) A receivership established under section 71-2086 may be terminated by the district court which established it after a hearing upon an application for termination. The application may be filed:

(a) Jointly by the receiver and the current licensee of the health care facility which is in receivership, stating that the deficiencies in the operation, maintenance, or other circumstances which were the grounds for establishment of the receivership have been corrected and that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the health care facility will be operated in compliance with all applicable statutes and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto;

(b) By the current licensee of the health care facility, alleging that termination of the receivership is merited for the reasons set forth in subdivision (a) of this subsection, but that the receiver has declined to join in the petition for termination of the receivership;

(c) By the receiver, stating that all residents or patients of the health care facility have been relocated elsewhere and that there are reasonable grounds to believe it will not be feasible to again operate the health care facility on a sound financial basis and in compliance with federal and state laws and regulations and asking that the court approve the surrender of the license of the health care facility to the department and the subsequent return of the control of the premises of the health care facility to the owner of the premises; or

(d) By the department (i) stating that the deficiencies in the operation, maintenance, or other circumstances which were the grounds for establishment of the receivership have been corrected and that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the health care facility will be operated in compliance with all applicable statutes and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto or (ii) stating that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the health care facility cannot be operated in compliance with federal or state law and regulations and asking that the court order the removal of the residents or patients to appropriate alternative placements, the closure of the facility, and the license, if any, surrendered to the department or that the health care facility be sold under reasonable terms approved by the court to a new owner meeting the requirements for licensure by the department.

(2) If the receivership has not been terminated within six months after the appointment of the receiver, the court shall, after hearing, order either that the health care facility be closed after an orderly transfer of the residents or patients to appropriate alternative placements or that the health care facility be sold under reasonable terms approved by the court to a new owner meeting the requirements for licensure by the department. The closure or sale shall occur within sixty days after the court order, unless ordered otherwise, to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the residents or patients.

Laws 1983, LB 274, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-6004;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 68;

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 17.